District of Columbia statutes.
6-311.01

Neighborhood development programs.

Notwithstanding any requirement or condition to the contrary in § 6-301.05 [repealed] or 6-301.18(i) [repealed] or in any other provision of law, the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency may plan and undertake neighborhood development programs under part B of title I of the Housing Act of 1949 (as added by this section), subject to all of the provisions of subchapter I of this chapter to the extent not inconsistent with such part B, and any such program shall be regarded as complying with the requirements of such §§ 6-301.05 [repealed] and 6-301.18(i) [repealed] and of such other provision of law if it meets the applicable requirements established under such part B.

History

Aug. 1, 1968, 82 Stat. 520, Pub. L. 90-448, title V, § 501(c)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-321.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-821.
1973 Ed., § 5-719a.

References in Text

Part B of title I of the Housing Act of 1949, referred to in this section, is the Act of July 15, 1949, 63 Stat. 413, ch. 338.

The parenthetical phrase “as added by this section” has reference to § 501(b) of the Act of August 1, 1968, 82 Stat. 520, Pub. L. 90-448.